Maryland, session 2026, HB1462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1462*

HOUSE BILL 1462
Article – State Finance and Procurement
14–106.
(a) In this section, “Committee” means the Pricing and Selection Committee for
Preferred Providers.
(b) There is a Pricing and Selection Committee for Preferred Providers.
(c) The Committee consists of the following 6 members:
(1) the Secretary of Transportation or a designee;
(2) the Chief Procurement Officer or a designee;
(3) the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services or a designee;
(4) the Assistant Secretary for Vocational Rehabilitation within the State
Department of Education or a designee;
(5) the Secretary of Labor or a designee; and
(6) the Special Secretary for the Office of Small, Minority, DISABILITY,
and Women Business Affairs or a designee.
(d) A member of the Committee:
(1) may not receive compensation; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations as provided in the State budget.
(e) (1) Blind Industries and Services of Maryland shall provide staff for the
Committee.
(2) The staff provided in accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall:
(i) be a blind or a visually impaired associate of Blind Industries
and Services of Maryland; and
(ii) complete work related to the duties of the Committee regarding
Blind Industries and Services of Maryland under the supervision and direction of the
Committee.
(f) The Committee shall:

HOUSE BILL 1462 3
(1) ensure that supplies and services provided by Blind Industries and
Services of Maryland or an Employment Works Program community service provider create
work opportunities for individuals who have a mental or physical disability, including
blindness, for which Blind Industries and Services of Maryland or the Employment Works
Program community service provider was established to assist;
(2) set the prices of supplies and services that Blind Industries and
Services of Maryland provides to reflect the fair market prices for the supplies and services;
(3) review and verify the prevailing average market prices, as proposed by
Maryland Correctional Enterprises:
(i) when changes are made to the pricing of existing supplies and
services that are available from Maryland Correctional Enterprises; and
(ii) for new supplies or services that Maryland Correctional
Enterprises intends to make available;
(4) establish procedures to govern procurement of supplies, services, and
other sales from Employment Works Program community service providers and individual
with disability owned businesses;
(5) from the State procurement list, choose appropriate supplies, services,
and other sales for Employment Works Program community service providers and
individual with disability owned businesses to offer for procurement;
(6) provide that the State procure those supplies, services, and other sales
from an Employment Works Program community service provider or an individual with
disability owned business;
(7) if supplies, services, or other sales are not available for procurement
from a unit of the State government, determine whether supplies, services, or other sales
are available from an Employment Works Program community service provider or an
individual with disability owned business;
(8) determine the fair market price of supplies, services, and other sales
that Employment Works Program community service providers and individual with
disability owned businesses provide;
(9) in accordance with market conditions, adjust prices for the supplies,
services, and other sales that Employment Works Program community service providers
and individual with disability owned businesses provide;
(10) at the request of a community service provider or an individual with
disability owned business, review and, if appropriate, change the price of a supply or
service; and

HOUSE BILL 1462
(11) review a request submitted from and may grant a waiver to the State
or a State–aided or controlled entity in accordance with § 14–103(d)(1) of this subtitle.
(g) In addition to the duties specified under subsection (f) of this section, the
Committee shall:
(1) establish and periodically review eligibility policies or guidelines for
participating community service providers and individual with disability owned
businesses;
(2) maintain a current list of community service providers and individual
with disability owned businesses;
(3) periodically review and revise its list of community service providers
and individual with disability owned businesses; and
(4) send any revised list to the Chief Procurement Officer who shall make
the list available to each person responsible for buying supplies or services for the State or
a State aided or controlled entity.
14–108.
(a) In this section, “Program” means the Employment Works Program.
(b) There is an Employment Works Program in the Governor’s Office of Small,
Minority, DISABILITY, and Women Business Affairs.
(c) The Special Secretary for the Office of Small, Minority, DISABILITY, and
Women Business Affairs shall designate Maryland Works, Inc., or another appropriate
coordinating entity, to facilitate the distribution of procurement contracts for supplies and
services among community service providers and individual with disability owned
businesses.
(d) The coordinating entity designated under subsection (c) of this section shall:
(1) identify potential contracts for supplies and services eligible for
procurement;
(2) establish procedures for the selection of community service providers to
perform under potentially eligible contracts for preference procurement;
(3) establish procedures for remediation of noncompliance with State or
Program policies;
(4) provide training and technical assistance to participating community
service providers;

HOUSE BILL 1462 5
(5) conduct cost analyses and market research for submission and review
by the Pricing and Selection Committee for the Program;
(6) provide staff support for the Pricing and Selection Committee for the
Program; and
(7) serve as a monitoring agent to ensure that high quality standards are
met and maintained by the Program and its participating community service providers.
Article – State Government
9–4101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Department” means the Department of Social and Economic Mobility.
(c) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Social and Economic Mobility.
(d) “Unit of State government” or “unit” means an agency or unit of the Executive
Branch of State government.
9–4102.
(a) There is a Department of Social and Economic Mobility, established as a
principal department of the State government.
(b) (1) The head of the Department is the Secretary of Social and Economic
Mobility, who shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.
(2) The Secretary serves at the pleasure of the Governor.
(c) The following units are in the Department:
(1) the Office of Minority Business Enterprises;
(2) the Office of Small, Minority, DISABILITY, and Women Business
Affairs; and
(3) the Office of Social Equity.
(d) The Department shall employ staff to carry out its duties as provided in the
State budget.
9–4103.

HOUSE BILL 1462
(a) The purpose of the Department is to:
(1) provide support for units of State government, individuals, and
businesses for the maintenance of social equity policies in the State;
(2) monitor trends in social equity programs and policies across the nation;
(3) propose new and innovative approaches to social equity programs;
(4) compile and produce reports and recommendations related to social
equity;
(5) ensure the fulfillment of the roles and responsibilities of the entities
and social equity programs in the State for which it is the successor;
(6) track the performance of social equity programs and small or
disadvantaged business assistance programs;
(7) promote and encourage full participation in the regulated cannabis
industry by individuals from communities that have previously been disproportionately
impacted by the war on drugs in order to positively impact those communities and other
duties assigned to the Office of Social Equity established under this subtitle;
(8) support small or disadvantaged businesses in the State through all
duties assigned to the Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, DISABILITY, and Women
Business Affairs; and
(9) carry out the duties of the Office of Minority Business Enterprises
within the Maryland Department of Transportation, including duties assigned to support
small or disadvantaged businesses.
(b) The Department shall:
(1) connect a person with programs in State, federal, and local government
that serve designated populations to ensure the person is connected to programs and other
opportunities the person is eligible for;
(2) provide units of State government with assistance related to the
purpose of the Department by:
(i) facilitating information sharing between units;
(ii) maintaining an inventory of social equity work performed by
each unit and relevant reports from those units;
(iii) conducting policy analyses on social equity and the effectiveness
of social equity programs;

HOUSE BILL 1462 7
(iv) adopting standards for units to promote social equity; and
(v) providing technical assistance to units; and
(3) adopt regulations to carry out this subtitle.
9–4107.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Department of Social and Economic Mobility
Special Fund.
(b) There is a Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to pay the costs of the operation of:
(1) the Office of Social Equity; [and]
(2) the Office of Minority Business Enterprises; AND
(3) THE OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, DISABILITY, AND WOMEN
BUSINESS AFFAIRS.
(d) The Department shall administer the Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(f) (1) The Fund consists of:
(i) revenue distributed to the Fund under § 2–1302.2 of the Tax –
General Article;
(ii) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(iii) interest earnings of the Fund; and
(iv) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund.
(2) The Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation
from the Transportation Trust Fund to the Fund equal to the amount necessary to defray
the operations and administrative expenses of the Office of Minority Business Enterprises.

HOUSE BILL 1462
(g) The Fund may be used only for paying the costs of the operation and
administrative expenses of:
(1) the Office of Social Equity; [and]
(2) the Office of Minority Business Enterprises; AND
(3) THE OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, DISABILITY, AND WOMEN
BUSINESS AFFAIRS.
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(i) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the State
budget.
(j) Money expended from the Fund for the Office of Social Equity or the Office of
Minority Business Enterprises is supplemental to and is not intended to take the place of
funding that otherwise would be appropriated for the Office of Social Equity [or], the Office
of Minority Business Enterprises, OR THE OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, DISABILITY,
AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS.
9–4111.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Governor’s Subcabinet” means the Governor’s Subcabinet on Socioeconomic
Procurement Participation.
(c) (1) “Minority person” means:
(i) an individual who has been deprived of the opportunity to
develop and keep a competitive position in the economy because of a social or economic
disadvantage that arises from cultural, racial, or other similar causes; or
(ii) a sheltered workshop for individuals with disabilities.
(2) “Minority person” includes:
(i) an Aleut;
(ii) an American Indian;
(iii) a Black;

HOUSE BILL 1462 9
(iv) an Eskimo;
(v) a Hispanic;
(vi) an Oriental;
(vii) a Puerto Rican; or
(viii) a woman.
(d) “Office” means the Office of Small, Minority, DISABILITY, and Women
Business Affairs.
(e) “Special Secretary” means the Special Secretary for the Office of Small,
Minority, DISABILITY, and Women Business Affairs.
9–4112.
There is an Office of Small, Minority, DISABILITY, and Women Business Affairs in
the Department.
9–4113.
(a) The head of the Office of Small, Minority, DISABILITY, and Women Business
Affairs is the Special Secretary, who shall be appointed by and serves at the pleasure of the
Governor.
(b) The Special Secretary shall receive the salary provided in the State budget.
9–4114.
(a) There is a Governor’s Subcabinet on Socioeconomic Procurement
Participation.
(b) The Governor’s Subcabinet is composed of:
(1) the Special Secretary of the Governor’s Office of Small, Minority,
DISABILITY, and Women Business Affairs, who shall serve as chair of the Subcabinet;
(2) the Secretary of Budget and Management, or the Secretary’s designee;
(3) the Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of General Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;

HOUSE BILL 1462
(6) the Secretary of Housing and Community Development, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(7) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(8) the Secretary of Information Technology, or the Secretary’s designee;
(9) the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(10) the Secretary of Transportation, or the Secretary’s designee;
(11) the Secretary of Veterans and Military Families, or the Secretary’s
designee;
(12) the Chief Procurement Officer for the State, or the Chief Procurement
Officer’s designee;
(13) the Minority Business Enterprise Ombudsman, or the Ombudsman’s
designee; and
(14) any other head of a department or agency that is accountable to the
Governor, as deemed necessary by the Governor.
(c) The Governor’s Subcabinet shall:
(1) meet:
(i) a minimum of once each quarter; and
(ii) at a frequency deemed appropriate by the chair;
(2) study socioeconomic procurement programs in other states to identify
successes and best practices;
(3) develop accountability measures for procurement forecasts, strategic
plans, Procurement Review Group processes, and liaison officer accountability;
(4) work with the Office of State Procurement to implement process
improvements that directly impact socioeconomic procurement businesses’ ability to fairly
compete for and understand State contracting opportunities;
(5) identify and recommend statutory and regulatory reforms to
strengthen and improve the State’s socioeconomic procurement programs; and

HOUSE BILL 1462 11
(6) recommend actions to make improvements to the Small Business
Reserve Program, the Minority Business Enterprise Program, and the Veteran Small
Business Enterprise Program.
(d) On or before December 31, 2025, and each December 1 thereafter, the
Governor’s Subcabinet shall report to the Governor on the Governor’s Subcabinet’s
activities, progress, and recommendations.
9–4117.
Subject to the limitations of any law that governs the activities of other units of the
Executive Branch of the State government, the Special Secretary shall:
(1) advise the Governor on:
(i) the activities of the State government that are intended to
promote:
1. the employment of minority persons in the State; and
2. State contracting opportunities available to and the
accessibility of those contracting opportunities to companies owned by minority persons,
small businesses, and veteran–owned small businesses; and
(ii) each other matter that affects the rights and interests of minority
persons, INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES, small businesses, and veteran–owned small
businesses and the communities in which they live, work, and provide employment
opportunities to others; and
(2) as authorized by the Governor:
(i) provide help to minority persons, INDIVIDUALS WITH
DISABILITIES, small businesses, and veteran–owned small businesses and the
communities in which they live, work, and employ others;
(ii) represent the Governor in any matter that relates to minority
persons, INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES, small businesses, and veteran–owned small
businesses or generally to the promotion of equality among the people of the State; and
(iii) perform any other responsibility that the Governor assigns.
9–4120.
(a) On or before the 15th day of each regular session of the General Assembly, the
Special Secretary shall send an annual report on the Office of Small, Minority,
DISABILITY, and Women Business Affairs:

HOUSE BILL 1462
(1) to the Governor; and
(2) subject to § 2–1257 of this article, to the General Assembly.
(b) The annual report may be prepared in conjunction with the report required
under § 14–305(b) of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, as provided in this Act:
(a) The Office of Small, Minority, Disability, and Women Business Affairs is the
successor of the Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs.
(b) In every law, executive order, rule, regulation, policy, or document created by
an official, an employee, or a unit of this State, the names and titles of those agencies and
officials mean the names and titles of the successor agency or official.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That nothing in this Act affects the
term of office of an appointed or elected member of any commission, office, department,
agency, or other unit. An individual who is a member of a unit on the effective date of this
Act shall remain for the balance of the term to which appointed or elected, unless the
member sooner dies, resigns, or is removed under provisions of law.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That any transaction or
employment status affected by or flowing from any change of nomenclature or any statute
amended by this Act and validly entered into or existing before the effective date of this Act
and every right, duty, or interest flowing from a statute amended by this Act remains valid
after the effective date of this Act and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or
enforced as required or allowed by any statute amended by this Act as though the
amendment had not occurred. If a change in nomenclature involves a change in name or
designation of any State unit, the successor unit shall be considered in all respects as
having the powers and obligations granted the former unit.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The continuity of every commission, office, department, agency, or other unit
is retained.
(b) The personnel, records, files, furniture, fixtures, and other properties and all
appropriations, credits, assets, liabilities, and obligations of each retained unit are
continued as the personnel, records, files, furniture, fixtures, properties, appropriations,
credits, assets, liabilities, and obligations of the unit under the laws enacted by this Act.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That letterhead, business cards,
and other documents reflecting the renaming of the Office of Small, Minority, and Women
Business Affairs to be the Office of Small, Minority, Disability, and Women Business Affairs
may not be used until all letterhead, business cards, and other documents already in print
and reflecting the name of the Office before the effective date of this Act have been used.

HOUSE BILL 1462 13
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.